Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 8. Irrigation and Water Rights

§ 1. Water is state property.

The water of all natural streams, springs, lakes or other collections of still water, within the boundaries of the state, are hereby declared to be the property of the state.

Cross references. —

As to control of water, see art. 1, § 31, Wyo. Const.

As to acquisition of water rights by municipalities, see art. 13, § 5, Wyo. Const.

As to water and water rights generally, see title 41.

Consent of United States. —

This section is not void on the ground that the United States is primarily possessed of title to the waters of the stream flowing across the public lands, since the act of congress admitting the state into the union accepted, ratified, and confirmed the constitution the people had formed, and thereby, and by the several desert-land acts, congress consented to such appropriation by the state. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

Constitutionality of section. —

This section is not in conflict with the federal constitution, as divesting those who had appropriated parts of waters prior to the adoption of the constitution of their property, since they never acquired any title to the water in the natural channels before it was diverted into the private ditches or laterals, and only the running water in the natural channel was appropriated to the state. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

Water reserved on Wind River Indian reservation. —

The admission of Wyoming to the Union did not evidence an intent by Congress not to reserve water for the Wind River Indian reservation. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

And state may monitor. —

The provisions in a stream adjudication decree, authorizing the state engineer to monitor Indian reserved water rights, were proper, as they contemplated neither the application of state law nor the authority to deprive the Tribes of water without the assistance of the courts in a suit for the administration of the decree. The role of the state engineer was not to apply state law, but to enforce the reserved rights against state appropriators, as decreed under principles of federal law. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Supervision and control. —

The legislature has power to authorize by statute the supervision and control of the appropriation and distribution of the public waters of the state by administrative officers, pursuant to adjudicated priorities. Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

A district court may not assign the duties of administering state water within a reservation to a tribal water agency. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

State ownership of water is subject to a trust.

Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1903); Lake De Smet Reservoir Co. v. Kaufmann, 75 Wyo. 87, 292 P.2d 482,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1956); Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961).

Waters subject to appropriation and abandonment. —

Waters from sources within the constitutional classifications of this section are subject to appropriation and, likewise, abandonment. Bruegman v. Johnson Ranches, Inc., 520 P.2d 489,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1974).

Water rights may not be acquired by adverse possession. —

The district court correctly dismissed a complaint seeking a determination of ownership in water rights by virtue of adverse possession, for the simple reason that water rights may not be acquired by adverse possession or prescription in this state. Lewis v. State Bd. of Control, 699 P.2d 822,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1985).

What waters appropriable. —

Water which would naturally reach a stream if not intercepted is appropriable. Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

In view of this section, only waters of natural streams, springs or lakes are subject to appropriation. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Where during course of 30 years seepage water flowing down a draw finally made a regular, natural stream with definite channels and banks, waters thereof are subject to appropriation. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Condition precedent to appropriation. —

Appropriation permit and application therefor to state engineer was condition precedent to lawful appropriation, notwithstanding that this article does not require such permit. Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1925).

Watercourse defined. —

A watercourse is a stream of water usually flowing in a particular direction, with well defined banks and channels, but the water need not flow throughout the year. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Natural stream. —

Fact that, before irrigation of lands under a federal reclamation project commenced, a wash or channel within the lands covered by the project carried water only as the run-off from rain or melting snow and was generally dry during all the irrigating season showed that the wash was not a natural stream within this section. United States v. Ide, 277 F. 373, 1921 U.S. App. LEXIS 2017 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1921), aff'd, 263 U.S. 497, 44 S. Ct. 182, 68 L. Ed. 407, 1924 U.S. LEXIS 2813 (U.S. 1924).

Where draw was dry most of the time, was covered with grass, had no banks and evidence showed no natural outlet, evidence failed to sustain state's contention that draw was natural stream. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Title to water in natural streams in Wyoming is in state,

but water is subject to withdrawal or appropriation for irrigation or other beneficial use. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Seepage water. —

In accordance with the constitutional provisions of this state, and, in line with previous holdings of the supreme court, seepage water arising on a farmer's land is subject to appropriation by him (subject to prescribed procedures) for lands other than those upon which the seepage arises. Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

Percolating waters

developed artificially by excavations and other artificial means belong to the owner of the land upon which they are developed, and are not waters of the state which may be appropriated. Hunt v. Laramie, 26 Wyo. 160, 181 P. 137,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1919), limited, Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

Private waters. —

An attempted appropriation of waste and seepage waters, being private waters, is void. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Seepage and waste water is private water so long as it is on the lands from which it originates and such water cannot be appropriated by adjoining landowners. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Reservoirs. —

Water may, in this state, be impounded in a reservoir by anyone who is neither the owner or in possession of any land. The owner of such reservoir may sell, lease, transfer, and use such water in such manner and upon such lands as the owner may desire. In other words, one man may divert and impound water, under an application to, and permit by, the state engineer, for the ultimate use of it by another. The only material difference between such case and diversion by direct flow from a stream seems to be that in the former case the water is not required to be attached to land, while in the latter case it is. Kearney Lake Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake Desmet Reservoir Co., 475 P.2d 548,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1970).

Reservoir rights are subject to abandonment. Kearney Lake Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake Desmet Reservoir Co., 475 P.2d 548,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1970).

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights in a reservoir was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were previously adjudicated in 1963. In re Gen. Adjudication of All Rights, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(2004).

Priority of right. —

A priority of right in water includes the quality as well as the quantity so that an oil producer has no right to deteriorate the quality of the water in a stream as against persons lower down on the stream having priority. Sussex Land & Live Stock Co. v. Midwest Refining Co., 294 F. 597, 1923 U.S. App. LEXIS 2531 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1923).

Public right to use waters for floating usable craft not to be interfered with. —

Irrespective of the ownership of the bed or channel of waters, and irrespective of their navigability, the public has the right to use public waters of Wyoming for floating usable craft and that use may not be interfered with or curtailed by any landowner. Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961).

Extent of public easement in nonnavigable river. —

In a dispute over a river which is nonnavigable, the supreme court held that its riparian owners have title to the bed and channel of the river, but that this title is subject to an easement for a right-of-way of the river's waters in their natural channel through, over and across the owner's lands; that the waters of the river are the property of the state and are held by it in trust for the equal use and benefit of the public; and that the waters of the river may be used by the public for floating usable craft therein or thereon and for transporting in such usable craft persons or property. Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961).

Abatement of dam as nuisance. —

A dam more than 10 feet high may be abated as nuisance though it is not in natural stream, but only to extent that it is above 10 feet high and without inflicting unnecessary injury. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Suit against state. —

Nebraska irrigation district action to restrain Wyoming water officials from unlawfully permitting junior appropriators to take water and to compel distribution in proper order is not suit against state. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Applied

in

Thayer v. City of Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978); In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1909); State ex rel. Mitchell Irrigation Dist. v. Parshall, 22 Wyo. 318, 140 P. 830,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1914).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Rights of Wyoming Appropriators in Underground Water,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 111.

For article, “Constitutionality of the Wyoming Underground Water Statute,” see 3 Wyo. L.J. 140.

For article, “Record Title to Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

For article, “Water Rights of Various Levels of Government — States' Rights v. National Powers,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 189 (1965).

For comment, “Water Appropriation for Recreation,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 209 (1966).

For article, “Legal Aspects of Weather Modification Snowpack Augmentation in Wyoming,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1967).

For article, “Transfer of Water Rights — Errata and Addenda — Sales for Recreational Purposes and to Districts,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 321 (1967).

For article, “Public Rights in Navigable State Waters — Some Statutory Approaches,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1971).

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For comment, “Water Saved or Water Lost: The Consequences of Individual Conservation Measures in the Appropriation States,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1976).

See comment, “Marketing of Surplus Water from Federal Reservoirs,” XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 835 (1978).

See case note, “Importation Doctrine Applied to Water Transfers Within a River System: A Step Too Far,” XV Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1980).

For comment, “Statutory Recognition of Instream Flow Preservation: A Proposed Solution for Wyoming,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 139 (1982).

For case note, “Water Law — Statutory Forfeiture of Water Rights in Wyoming. Wheatland Irr. Dist. v. Laramie Rivers Co., 659 P.2d 561,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 93 (1984).

For comment, “Solar Access Rights in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1984).

For case note, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute. Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

For article, “Waist Deep in the Big Muddy: Property Rights, Public Values, and Instream Waters,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public rights of recreational boating, fishing, wading, or the like, in inland stream the bed of which is privately owned, 6 ALR4th 1030.

§ 2. Board of control.

There shall be constituted a board of control, to be composed of the state engineer and superintendents of the water divisions; which shall, under such regulations as may be prescribed by law, have the supervision of the waters of the state and of their appropriation, distribution and diversion, and of the various officers connected therewith. Its decisions to be subject to review by the courts of the state.

Cross references. —

As to board of control, see §§

41-4-201

to

41-4-211

.

State engineer. —

The state engineer is an executive officer appointed by and subject to removal by only the governor of In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

The state engineer is not subject to impeachment; neither the Constitution nor the statutes contemplate that a district court should have the authority to remove or replace the state engineer as the administrator of Wyoming water. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Police power. —

The state may regulate, control the appropriation, and distribution of the public waters through the board of control, in the exercise of the state's police power. Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

Board has broad powers,

direct and implied. White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

Power to insure maximum beneficial use of all water. —

The board of control must, in order to insure proper administration and use of the state's water, be said to possess such powers as will insure the maximum beneficial use of all water without regard to its source. John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

And its orders establishing water rights are clothed with the dignity of court decrees.

White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

Discretion of board. —

Board of control, charged with duty of determining priorities on streams, has discretion in deciding meaning of “stream.” Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Authority to change diversion point. —

The authority of the board of control to change a point of diversion when they have no direct statutory authority is not subject to doubt as the board has broad powers, direct and implied. John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

Board's rights not in conflict with incident of land commissioners' trustee obligations. —

The board of land commissioners may, under §

36-7-322

, accept from a defaulting water permittee the right to contract with other permittees as to the priority of water rights under a common permit as an incident of the board's trustee obligations and this right of contract is not related to, or in conflict with, the rights granted the board of control by this section. Dechert v. Christopulos, 604 P.2d 1039,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1980).

Unrestricted city right to use imported waters. —

Where a city has the unrestricted right to reuse, successively use and make disposition of certain imported waters, there is nothing for the state engineer or the board to consider. Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Adjudication of water right. —

Upon application to adjudicate water right, it is duty of board in first instance to determine under law whether applicant has water right, and board's finding thereon may properly become basis of an appeal to district court. State ex rel. Mitchell Irrigation Dist. v. Parshall, 22 Wyo. 318, 140 P. 830,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1914).

Pursuant to this section and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were previously adjudicated in 1963. In re Gen. Adjudication of All Rights, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(2004).

Decision of the board is a final determination

of the question before it for consideration in the absence of a review by the district court upon objections filed thereto. Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. Lincoln Land Co., 50 Wyo. 229, 59 P.2d 763,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1936).

Board's adjudication of water priorities is prima facie evidence of correctness

even as to those not party to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

In action to quiet title to water right, notice of adjudication of Big Laramie river having been appropriately given and established, evidence was sufficient to show that board of control had jurisdiction to adjudicate rights in that stream, thus giving defendants and all similarly situated prima facie right to water therefrom adjudicated to them, and also showing their interest in controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Presumptions of regularity. —

If any tribunal has unlimited jurisdiction over a class of cases, it stands on same footing as courts of general jurisdiction respecting presumptions of regularity, including the presumption that due notice was given. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Recital in water adjudication decree by state board of control that due notice had been given to interested parties raises same presumption in favor of such inferior tribunal as obtains with respect of courts of general jurisdiction to show jurisdiction of the parties. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In action to quiet title to water right prescriptively claimed by plaintiffs in Little Laramie River, allegation in answer of defendant that board of control had adjudicated a water right to predecessor of plaintiff, which was admitted, carried with it presumption of appearance and also of regularity, and all objections to pleadings must be overruled. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Decree by state board of control relating to water rights on Little Laramie River, though failing to recite notice to interested parties, was entered nearly 50 years ago, and courts indulge presumption the more readily when proceedings are ancient, attack is collateral, and it is admitted that decree adjudicated rights in favor of plaintiff's predecessors in interest, that it was entered after appearance, whether with or without notice. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Opportunity to present claims. —

Original appropriators, predecessors of plaintiffs, having been afforded full opportunity to present their claims for adjudication of water rights were not deprived of any constitutional right, and plaintiffs are in no better position. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Admissibility of decree. —

A copy of the record of the decree of adjudication, certified by the clerk of the board of control as true and correct copy of original decree, is admissible as against contention that record of decrees lacked authentication. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Where photostatic copies of pen and ink records of decrees by board of control show nothing more suspicious than interlineations, interlineations will not render them inadmissible, especially where decrees were ancient documents. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In action by plaintiffs to quiet title, claimed by prescription, to water right in Little Laramie River watershed, and to which defendants set up decrees in that and Big Laramie rivers, the determination or adjudication in connection with Little Laramie was relevant to show plaintiffs' claim is unfounded, and determination in Big Laramie was relevant to show defendants' interest in the controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In suit to quiet title to water rights in the Little Laramie River, claimed by prescription, answer setting up defense of decrees by board of control respecting water rights in Big Laramie River, plaintiff admitting that board had instituted proceedings and decreed rights in latter river and its tributaries, but denying other allegations, effect is that decree itself only is questioned, and defendant was not required to anticipate attack on its appropriation on ground it was smaller or of different priority than that shown by decree. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Laches. —

Where suits to quiet title to water rights in Little Laramie River were started in 1932 attacking appropriation claimed by defendant under an adjudication of board of control in 1903, the attack was, at least upon largest part of defendant's appropriation, barred by “laches.” Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Section is not mandate for review. —

Although this section states that the board's decisions are subject to review by the court, this is not a mandate for review. Yentzer v. Hemenway, 440 P.2d 7,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 441 P.2d 320,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1968).

Jurisdiction of courts. —

State board of control is not vested with exclusive jurisdiction of actions to determine priority of water rights, and such actions may be brought in courts. Simmons v. Ramsbottom, 51 Wyo. 419, 68 P.2d 153,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1937).

Jurisdiction of courts, in matters of water adjudications, is, aside from appeals, confined to determine rights in individual cases, to the extent that the board of control has not acted. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Applied

in

In re Declaration of Abandonment of Wolfley Appropriation, 695 P.2d 159,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1985); Lewis v. State Bd. of Control, 699 P.2d 822,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

State ex rel. Christopulos v. Husky Oil Co., 575 P.2d 262,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1978); Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 50 L.R.A. 747 (1900); State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1909); People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(1924).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Constitutionality of the Wyoming Underground Water Statute,” see 3 Wyo. L.J. 140.

For article, “Priority and Progress — Case Studies in the Transfer of Water Rights,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1966).

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

See case note, “Importation Doctrine Applied to Water Transfers Within a River System: A Step Too Far,” XV Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1980).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For case note, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute. Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 3. Priority of appropriation.

Priority of appropriation for beneficial uses shall give the better right. No appropriation shall be denied except when such denial is demanded by the public interests.

Cross references. —

As to determination of priority, see §

41-4-317

.

Intrastate operation of laws. —

The laws of the state regulating the distribution of water cannot operate beyond its borders. Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1903).

Rule of priority of appropriation. —

Wyoming has the rule of priority of water appropriation as distinguished from the rule of riparian rights. Nebraska v. Wyoming, 325 U.S. 589, 65 S. Ct. 1332, 66 S. Ct. 1, 89 L. Ed. 1815, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 2620 (U.S. 1945), modified, 345 U.S. 981, 73 S. Ct. 1041, 97 L. Ed. 1394, 1953 U.S. LEXIS 1909 (U.S. 1953).

Appropriation required. —

The right to use the water of a stream for beneficial purposes depends on a prior appropriation thereof. Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1903).

Beneficial use is dependent upon particular circumstance of each case.

John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

Effect of statutory shortcomings on right of water user. —

While ideally efficient management of the state's water is desirable, because of statutory or administrative shortcomings, a water user should not be required to suffer the loss of a valuable water right when there has been beneficial use. Snake River Land Co. v. State Bd. of Control, 560 P.2d 733,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1977).

Appropriations can only be made by securing a permit

as required by statute. Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1925).

Property right in water. —

Appropriations can only be made by securing a permit

as required by statute. Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(1925).Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964,

1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370

(10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Title to water in natural streams in Wyoming is in state

but water is subject to withdrawal or appropriation for irrigation or other beneficial use. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Seepage water. —

In accordance with the constitutional provisions of Wyoming, and in line with previous holdings of the supreme court, seepage water arising on a farmer's land is subject to appropriation by him (subject to prescribed procedures) for lands other than those upon which the seepage arises. Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

Reservoirs. —

See Kearney Lake Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake Desmet Reservoir Co., 475 P.2d 548,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1970).

Suit against state. —

Nebraska irrigation district action to restrain Wyoming water officials from unlawfully permitting junior appropriators to take water and to compel distribution in proper order is not suit against state. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Applied

in

Lewis v. State Bd. of Control, 699 P.2d 822,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 50 L.R.A. 747 (1900); State ex rel. Mitchell Irrigation Dist. v. Parshall, 22 Wyo. 318, 140 P. 830,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1914); Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For address, “Decrees in Interstate Water Suits,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 13.

For article, “Rights of Wyoming Appropriators in Underground Water,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 111.

For note, “The Right to Use Waste Water Before It Re-enters the Stream,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 47 (1957).

For comment, “Improvement of Existing Water Rights Through Unification — A Case Study on the Consolidation of Appropriations,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1967).

For article, “Water Law's Double Environment,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 259 (1970).

For comment, “The Idaho and Montana Procedures for Obtaining Water Use Permits — Possible Sources for Improvement of Wyoming Law,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1975).

For comment, “Water Saved or Water Lost: The Consequences of Individual Conservation Measures in the Appropriation States,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1976).

For comment, “Statutory Recognition of Instream Flow Preservation: A Proposed Solution for Wyoming,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 139 (1982).

For case note, “Water Law — Statutory Forfeiture of Water Rights in Wyoming. Wheatland Irr. Dist. v. Laramie Rivers Co., 659 P.2d 561,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 93 (1984).

For case note, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute. Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 4. Water divisions.

The legislature shall by law divide the state into four (4) water divisions, and provide for the appointment of superintendents thereof.

Cross references. —

As to water divisions generally, see §§

41-3-501

to

41-3-506

.

Diversion and distribution of water. —

Division superintendents and water commissioners are charged exclusively with administrative duties in superintending diversion and distribution of water in strict conformity with adjudicated or determined priorities. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Suit against state. —

Nebraska irrigation district action to restrain Wyoming water officials from unlawfully permitting junior appropriators to take water and to compel distribution in proper order is not suit against state. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Cited

in

Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 50 L.R.A. 747 (1900); People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(1924).